Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 353.3. A. The State Board of Pharmacy shall consist of


six (6) persons, five who shall be licensed as pharmacists by this


state and one who shall be a public member.


1. The pharmacist members shall be appointed by the Governor by


and with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall:


a. be registered and in good standing in the State of


Oklahoma this state, and





Req. No. 1517 Page 1


b. have been actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy


within this state for a period of not less than five


(5) years immediately prior to serving on the Board.


2. The public member shall be appointed by the Governor and


shall:


a. be a resident of the State of Oklahoma this state for


not less than five (5) years, and


b. not be a pharmacist or be related by blood or marriage


within the third degree of consanguinity to a


pharmacist.


B. The present members of the Board shall be appointed for a


term of five (5) years. The public member of the Board shall serve


a term coterminous with the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure


of the Governor. The terms of the members of the Board shall expire


on the 30th day of June of the year designated for the expiration of


the term for which appointed but the member shall serve until a


qualified successor has been duly appointed. No person shall be


appointed to serve more than two consecutive terms. Appointments of


pharmacists to the Board shall be made from a list of ten (10) names


representative of the pharmacy profession submitted annually by the


Executive Director of the Oklahoma Pharmacists Association after an


election has been held by mail ballot. In selecting appointees, the


Governor may consider recommendations from a statewide organization


representing pharmacists, a state chapter of a national organization

Req. No. 1517 Page 2


representing pharmacists, or other groups or individuals in this


state.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1517 DC 1/16/2025 2:35:55 PM







































Req. No. 1517 Page 3